Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.250

Foreign national. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Foreign national" means:

(1) An individual who is not a citizen of the United States and is not lawfully admitted for permanent residence;

(2) A government, or subdivision, of a foreign country;

(3) A foreign political party; and

(4) Any entity, such as a partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of persons, that is organized under the laws of or has its principal place of business in a foreign country.

[ 2024 c 164 s 225.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.